Arkansas, session 2025, SB608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-106(a), concerning runoff elections for
county and municipal officers, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) If there are more than two (2) candidates for election to any
county elected office or a municipal office, including the office of justice
of the peace, at any general election held in this state and no candidate for
the county elected office or municipal office receives a majority of the
votes cast for the county elected office or municipal office, there shall be
a runoff general election held in that county or municipality four (4) weeks
following the date of the general election at which the names of the two (2)
candidates receiving the highest number of votes, but not a majority, shall
be placed on the ballot to be voted upon by the qualified electors of the
county or the municipality.
(2)(A) The following procedure will govern if there are more
than two (2) candidates for election to any municipal office at any general
election held in this state in which no candidate for the municipal office
receives either:
*SSS278*
04/02/2025 10:33:12 AM SSS278

SB608
(i) A majority of the votes cast; or
(ii) A plurality of forty percent (40%) of the votes
cast.
(B)(i) A candidate who receives a plurality of forty
percent (40%) of the votes cast must obtain at least twenty percent (20%)
more of the votes cast than the second-place candidate for the municipal
office to avoid a runoff general election against the second-place candidate.
(ii) If required, the runoff general election
between the two (2) candidates shall be held in that municipality four (4)
weeks following the date of the general election with the names of the two
(2) candidates placed on the ballot to be voted upon by the qualified
electors of the municipality.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-106(d), concerning runoff elections for
county and municipal officers, is amended to read as follows:
(d) If one (1) of the two (2) candidates who received the highest
number of votes for a county elected office or a municipal office but not a
majority of the votes in a county for a county elected office or either a
majority or both forty percent (40%) of the votes cast and at least twenty
percent (20%) more of the votes cast than the second-place candidate in a
municipality for a municipal office in the general election withdraws before
certification of the result of the general election, the remaining candidate
who received the most votes at the general election shall be declared elected
to the county elected office or municipal office and there shall be no runoff
general election.











04/02/2025 10:33:12 AM SSS278